New York, session 2025-2026, S4959.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. A state commission, to be known as the New York state 2 commission on government efficiency, hereafter referred to as the 3 commission, is hereby created to examine state spending, identify unnec- 4 essary and wasteful spending and issue a report of recommendations of 5 spending items that can be eliminated by New York state. 6 § 2. (a) The commission shall consist of eight members to be appointed 7 as follows: two members to be appointed by the temporary president of 8 the senate; two members to be appointed by the speaker of the assembly; 9 two members to be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and 10 two members to be appointed by the minority leader of the assembly. 11 Vacancies in the membership of the commission and among its officers 12 shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments or 13 designations. 14 (b) Members of the commission shall be appointed within 30 days of the 15 effective date of this act and shall serve for terms of two years. 16 (c) The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for 17 their services. 18 § 3. The commission shall specifically examine items of state spending 19 and identify unnecessary and wasteful spending by the state. 20 § 4. The commission shall make recommendations and issue an annual 21 report of its findings. The commission shall submit such report, includ- 22 ing specific recommendations and proposed legislation or regulatory 23 changes, as it may deem necessary and appropriate, to the governor, the 24 temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly no 25 later than one year after the appointment of the members of the commis- 26 sion, and then annually thereafter. 27 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09299-01-5